Wisconsin, session 2025, AB791.
do enact as follows:AB791,13Section 1. 256.35 (10) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB791,2,54256.35 (10) (a) Any person who intentionally dials or sends a text message to 1the telephone number “911” to report an emergency, knowing that the fact situation 2which he or she reports does not exist, shall be fined not less than $100 nor more 3than $600 or imprisoned not more than 90 days or both for the first offense and is 4guilty of a Class H felony for any other offense committed within 4 years after the 5first offense.AB791,2,66